California, session 20252026, SB4.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 15008 is added to the Government Code, to read:15008. The Missing and Murdered Indigenous Persons Justice Program is established within and under the discretion of the Department of Justice. The program shall have all of the following responsibilities:(a) Facilitate collaboration and act as a liaison between tribal victims’ families, tribal governments, and federal, tribal, state, and out-of-state law enforcement agencies, where appropriate, regarding active and inactive cases involving missing and murdered indigenous persons in California, including cases involving human trafficking.(b) Provide technical assistance to law enforcement agencies already engaged in investigating cases involving missing and murdered indigenous persons in California, including cases of human trafficking.(c) Publish data on the number of, and facts about, cases involving missing and murdered indigenous persons in California, where appropriate.(d) (1) Submit an annual report to both houses of the Legislature containing all of the following:(A) The cases the department acted as a liaison pursuant to subdivision (a) and provided technical assistance to law enforcement pursuant to subdivision (b).(B) The information published pursuant to subdivision (c).(C) An analysis of all appropriate data, and any recommendations to assist or improve upon necessary collaboration and coordination between local, state, and tribal governments in addressing missing and murdered indigenous persons in California.(2) (A) The requirement for submitting a report imposed pursuant to this subdivision is inoperative on and after January 1, 2029, 2028, pursuant to Section 10231.5.(B) The report to be submitted pursuant to this subdivision shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795.